New Jersey, session 222, S4264.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.   R.S.38:23-1 is amended to read as follows: 38:23-1.     a. A permanent or full-time temporary officer or employee of the State or of a board, commission, authority or other instrumentality of the State, or of a county, school district or municipality, who is a member of the 1[organized reserve of the] United States1 Army 1[of the United States] Reserve1, 1[United States Naval] Navy1 Reserve, 1[United States]1 Air Force Reserve1, Coast Guard Reserve,1 or 1[United States]1 Marine Corps Reserve, or other organization affiliated therewith, including the National Guard of other states, shall be entitled, in addition to pay received, if any, as a member of a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, to leave of absence from his or her respective duty without loss of pay or time on all work days on which he or she shall be engaged in any period of Federal active duty, provided, however, that such leaves of absence shall not exceed [30] 90 work days in any calendar year.  Such leave of absence shall be in addition to the regular vacation or other accrued leave allowed such officer or employee. Any leave of absence for such duty in excess of [30] 90 work days shall be without pay but without loss of time. b.   Notwithstanding subsection a. of this section, a full-time temporary officer or employee who has served under such temporary appointment for less than one year shall receive for the service hereinabove described leave without pay but without loss of time. (cf: P.L.2001, c.351, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.